Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-312
State Board of Education districts; population figures and maps; basis.

For purposes of section 79-311, the Legislature adopts the official population figures and maps from the 2020 Census Redistricting (Public Law 94-171) TIGER/Line Shapefiles published by the United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census.

Laws 1971, LB 735, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 554, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 619, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-322.02;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 140;

Laws 2001, LB 856, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB702, § 2;

Laws 2021, First Spec. Sess., LB7, § 2.